Arkansas, session 2025, HB1030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-128(d)(1)(A)(ii), concerning school
resource officer training requirements, is amended to read as follows:
(ii)(a) Attend a training in youth mental
health as required by the State Board of Education Obtain certification in
Youth Mental Health First Aid.
(b) The youth mental health training required
under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this section shall be obtained Youth
Mental Health First Aid certification shall be maintained and renewed every
four (4) years if the school resource officer remains assigned to or employed
*TNL008*
01-16-2025 15:36:44 TNL008

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1030
by a public school district;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-10-128(d)(1)(C)(ii), concerning
continuing education hours for school resource officers, is amended to read
as follows:
(ii) The youth mental health Youth Mental Health
First Aid training required under subdivision (d)(1)(A)(ii) of this section
and the school resource officer refresher training required under subdivision
(d)(1)(B) of this section shall count towards the twelve (12) hours of public
school-specific continuing education required under subdivision (d)(1)(C)(i)
of this section in the years during which the youth mental health Youth
Mental Health First Aid and school resource officer refresher trainings are
completed.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2004(d), concerning school counselor
training required for purposes of comprehensive student services, is amended
to read as follows:
(d) By September 1, 2024 2025, and every four (4) years following, a
school counselor shall receive youth mental health Youth Mental Health First
Aid training, as prescribed by the State Board of Education, to learn the
risk factors and warning signs of mental health issues in adolescents, the
importance of early intervention, and how to help an adolescent who is in
crisis or expecting a mental health challenge.

/s/T. Shephard











01-16-2025 15:36:44 TNL008